src/fst/stems/particles.lexc
!! # Particles
!!  The particles are all words that do not inflect at all. For compatibility
!!  reasons subsets of particles have been set off to classes like conjunctions,
!!  adverbs, adpositions, and interjections. The ones that are *not* in those classes are left here as
!!  particles.

LEXICON PARTICLE
!!  Examples:
!!€gt-norm:  Particles
!!€  ahaa: ahaa+Pcle
!!€  edes: edes+Pcle

!kai+Pcle:kai PCLE_VAAN ;

ellei+Pcle+CS:ellei  PCLE_VAAN  ;
elleivät+Pcle+CS:elleivät  PCLE_VAAN  ;
ellemme+Pcle+CS:ellemme  PCLE_VAAN  ;
ellen+Pcle+CS:ellen  PCLE_VAAN  ;
ellet+Pcle+CS:ellet  PCLE_VAAN  ;
ellette+Pcle+CS:ellette  PCLE_VAAN  ;

etteikö+Pcle+CS:etteikö  PCLE_VAAN  ;
ettei+Pcle+CS:ettei  PCLE_VAAN  ;
etteivät+Pcle+CS:etteivät  PCLE_VAAN  ;
ettemme+Pcle+CS:ettemme  PCLE_VAAN  ;
etten+Pcle+CS:etten  PCLE_VAAN  ;
ettet+Pcle+CS:ettet  PCLE_VAAN  ;
ettette+Pcle+CS:ettette  PCLE_VAAN  ;

juurijajuuri+Pcle:juurijajuuri  PCLE_VAAN ;
lukuunottamatta+Pcle:lukuunottamatta  PCLE_VAAN ;
nipinnapin+Pcle:nipinnapin  PCLE_VAAN ;
näinollen+Pcle:näinollen  PCLE_VAAN ;
sensijaan+Pcle:sensijaan  PCLE_VAAN ;
toisinsanoen+Pcle:toisinsanoen  PCLE_VAAN ;



LEXICON PCLE_AIKANSA

:  PCLE_BACK_POSS  ;


LEXICON PCLE_ALLE

:  PCLE_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;


LEXICON PCLE_HAH

:  PCLE_COMPOUND_INTERJ  ;
:  #  ;


LEXICON PCLE_HYVILLÄÄN

:  PCLE_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OBL  ;


LEXICON PCLE_IKINÄ

:  PCLE_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;


LEXICON PCLE_ILKOSILLAAN

:  PCLE_BACK_POSS_AN_OBL  ;


LEXICON PCLE_ISTUALLEEN

:  PCLE_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL  ;


!LEXICON PCLE_JO
!:  PCLE_BACK_CLIT_KO  ;
!:  #  ;


LEXICON PCLE_JONNE

:  PCLE_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
:  PCLE_BACK_CLIT_KA  ;


LEXICON PCLE_KOTONA

:  PCLE_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;


LEXICON PCLE_KUHUN

:  PCLE_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
:  PCLE_BACK_CLIT_KA_S  ;


LEXICON PCLE_LEVÄLLEEN

:  PCLE_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL  ;


LEXICON PCLE_LISÄKSI

:e  PCLE_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL  ;

:i  PCLE_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON PCLE_MITEN

:  PCLE_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
:  PCLE_FRONT_CLIT_KA_S  ;


LEXICON PCLE_NOPEASTI

:  PCLE_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON PCLE_NÄHDEN

:den  PCLE_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

:te  PCLE_FRONT_POSS  ;


LEXICON PCLE_NÄKYVIIN

:n  PCLE_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

:  PCLE_FRONT_POSS  ;


LEXICON PCLE_TYHMÄSTI

:  PCLE_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON PCLE_TYKÖ

:  PCLE_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;


LEXICON PCLE_VAAN

:  #  ;


LEXICON PCLE_VALTAAN

:n  PCLE_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

:  PCLE_BACK_POSS  ;


LEXICON PCLE_VUOKSI

:e  PCLE_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL  ;

:i  PCLE_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON PCLE_YLIPÄÄNSÄ

:  PCLE_FRONT_POSS  ;

LEXICON PCLE_YLLE

:  PCLE_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
